Nevada, session 83, SB296.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 237 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A governmental entity shall not enter into a nondisclosure
or confidentiality agreement unless the information that will be
-
*SB296*

– 2 –
kept confidential by the agreement is otherwise made confidential
pursuant to state or federal law.
2. As used in this section, “governmental entity” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 239.005.
Sec. 2. Chapter 239 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a record that
pertains to a predecisional or deliberative process between a
governmental entity and a private person or entity who is not
employed by or actively under contract with the governmental
entity concerning a rule, ordinance or regulation which the
governmental entity is considering adopting is a public record.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to deem a
predecisional or deliberative record of a governmental entity a
public record when the record was shared solely between
governmental entities or within a governmental entity.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
any contract entered into before October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB296*